src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BOAHTALADDANTVCT !!= * __@CODE@__
                                                                 +N+Sg+Nom:           K          ;
                                                              +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>         R          ;
                                              +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá      K          ;
                                              +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi      K          ;
                                                     +N+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:#          VEARA      ;
                                                                    +N+Ess:%>in       K          ;
                                                             +N+Ess+Use/NG:%>en       K          ; !Dialects
!                                                                   +N+Ess:%>e        K          ; !not for nouns
                                                                 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a        K          ;
                                                              +N+Cmp/SgGen:a          R          ;
  +N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Err/Orth:           K          ; !
                                                                 +N+Sg+Acc:%>a        K          ;
                                                                 +N+Pl+Nom:%>at       K          ;
                                                                 +N+Sg+Ill:%>ij       K          ;
                                                                 +N+Sg+Loc:%>is       K          ;
  +N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Err/Orth:%>in       K          ; ! !SOUTH
                                                                 +N+Sg+Com:%>ijn      K          ;
                                                                 +N+Sg+Com:%>ijnna    K          ;
                                                                 +N+Pl+Gen:%>ijd      K          ;
                                                              +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd      R          ;
                                                                 +N+Pl+Acc:%>ijd      K          ;
                                                                 +N+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda    K          ;
                                                                 +N+Pl+Loc:%>ijn      K          ;
  +N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Err/Orth:%>ijs      K          ; ! !SOUTH
  +N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Err/Orth:%>ijnna    K          ;
                                                                 +N+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn   K          ;
                                                              +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%-     ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
           +N+Sg+Nom+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>         NPx12C     ;
           +N+Sg+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>         NPxC       ;
           +N+Sg+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>         NPxC       ;
           +N+Sg+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>asa%>    NPxVvowch  ;
           +N+Sg+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>istti%>  NPxVvowch  ;
           +N+Sg+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
!                                                                  +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ; !^P^
           +N+Pl+Gen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
           +N+Pl+Acc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
           +N+Pl+Ill+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>ijddás%> NPxC       ;
           +N+Pl+Loc+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
           +N+Pl+Com+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:%>ijddi%>  NPxPlComV1 ;

LEXICON IHTAMAT   !!= * __@CODE@__ Plural action nouns, from bisyllabic verbs
                  +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%>         R          ;
  +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá      K          ;
  +N+Sem/Act+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi      K          ;
         +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:#          VEARA      ;
                        +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>in       K          ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Use/NG:%>en       K          ; !Dialects
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at       K          ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd      K          ;
                  +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd      R          ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd      K          ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda    K          ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn      K          ;
            +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna    K          ;
      +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs      K          ; ! !SOUTH
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn   K          ;
                  +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%-     ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
!                    +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%>  NPx1V      ;
!                              +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ; !^P^
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC       ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                     +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%>  NPxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON IHTALUDDAMAT   !!= * __@CODE@__  ihtaluddamat, plural
     +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:#          VEARA      ;
              +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/SgNom:%>         R          ;
                    +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>in       K          ;
           +N+Sem/Act+Ess+Err/Orth:%>en       K          ; !SDialects
!                   +N+Sem/Act+Ess:%>e        K          ; !not for nouns
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>at       K          ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijd      K          ;
              +N+Sem/Act+Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd      R          ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijd      K          ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijdda    K          ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijn      K          ;
        +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna    K          ;
  +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs      K          ; ! !SOUTH
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijgujn   K          ;
              +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij%-     ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
!                +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%>  NPx1V      ;
!                          +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ; !^P^
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC       ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%>  NPxVvowch  ;
                 +N+Sem/Act+Pl+Com:%>ijddi%>  NPxPlComV1 ;




LEXICON FALLA- !!= * __@CODE@__
   BOHCCO ;
   BOHCCU ;

LEXICON BOAZU-NE !!= * __@CODE@__
                    +Sg+Nom:        K         ;
                 +Cmp/SgNom:X7      flagON-R  ;
                 +Cmp/SgNom:        flagOFF-R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K         ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K         ;
                       +Ess:n       K         ;
                       +Ess:n%>     NPxC      ;
                +Err/DerSub:        KEAHTTA   ;


LEXICON BOHCCO !!= * __@CODE@__
                +Sg+Nom:     NPxV ;
                +Sg+Gen:     K    ;
                +Sg+Gen:     NPxV ;
             +Cmp/SgGen:     R    ; ! Already in LEXICON BOAZU
                +Sg+Acc:     K    ;
                +Sg+Acc:     NPxV ;
                +Sg+Ill:s%>  NPxC ;
                +Sg+Loc:s    K    ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:n    K    ; ! !SOUTH
                +Sg+Loc:st%> NPxC ;
                +Pl+Nom:t    K    ;
       +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:k    K    ; ! !Skániid dialect
