src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
EM-čiekčamat+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/First:EM-čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
SVL-cupčuoigamat+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/First:SVL-cup9#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
SVL-viehkamat+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/First:SVL-viehkam IHTAMAT ;
TV-báddemat+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/First:TV-báddem IHTAMAT ;
tv-báddemat+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/First:tv-báddem IHTAMAT ;
LEXICON Noun
puljačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:pulja#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
davvikalohttačuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:davvi#kalohtta#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
meašttirgilvvohallamat+CmpN/Sg:meašttir#gilvvohallam IHTAMAT ;
measttirgilvvohallamat+CmpN/Sg:measttir#gilvvohallam IHTAMAT ;
meaštárgilvvohallamat+CmpN/Sg:meaštár#gilvvohallam IHTAMAT ;
togavuojahallamat+CmpN/Sg:toga#vuojahallam IHTAMAT ;
meašttirčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:meašttir#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
measttirčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:measttir#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
meaštárčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:meaštár#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
meašttirčuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:meašttir#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
measttirčuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:measttir#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
meaštárčuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:meaštár#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
guovllučuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:guovllu#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
dálveráidočiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:dálve#ráido#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
eretčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgLeft+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:eret#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
verddečiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:verdde#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
finálačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:finála#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
ráidočaskimat+CmpN/Sg:ráido#časkim IHTAMAT ;
gaskaijačuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:gaska#ija#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
gaskavahkkočuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:gaska#vahkko#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
gaskavahkučuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:gaska#vahku#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
gaskačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:gaska#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
vuoitočiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:vuoito#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
geahččalanvuodjimat+CmpN/Sg:geahččalan#vuodjim IHTAMAT ;
geassečiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:geasse#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
geassečuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:geasse#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
guhkesčuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:guhkes#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
mánáidčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:mánáid9#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
hállemasčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:hállemas#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
ihtaluddamat+CmpN/SgLeft:ihtaluddam IHTALUDDAMAT ;
ihtamat+CmpN/Sg:ihtam IHTAMAT ;
ihttomat+CmpN/Sg:ihttom IHTAMAT ;
rátkkačuoigamat+CmpN/Sg:rátkka#čuoigam IHTAMAT ;
juovlaspábbačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:juovla#spábba#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
juovlačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:juovla#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
loahppavuodjimat+CmpN/Sg:loahppa#vuodjim IHTAMAT;
loahppačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:loahppa#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
loahppabáhčimat+CmpN/Sg:loahppa#báhčim IHTAMAT ;
luossagilvvohallamat+CmpN/Sg:luossa#gilvvohallam IHTAMAT ;
ruovttušilljočiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:ruovttu#šilljo#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
liigečiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:liige#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
measttirvuođagilvvohallamat+CmpN/Sg:measttirvuođa#gilvvohallam IHTAMAT ;
meašttirvuođagilvvohallamat+CmpN/Sg:meašttirvuođa#gilvvohallam IHTAMAT ;
meaštárvuođagilvvohallamat+CmpN/Sg:meaštárvuođa#gilvvohallam IHTAMAT ;
orohatčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:orohat#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
riikkačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:riikka#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
rátkkačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:rátkka#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
skuvlačiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:skuvla#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
sámemeasttirčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:sáme#measttir#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
sámemeašttirčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:sáme#meašttir#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
sámemeaštárčiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:sáme#meaštár#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
árvosátnelohkamat+CmpN/Sg:árvo#sátne#lohkam IHTAMAT ;
ávnnaslohkamat+CmpN/Sg:ávnnas#lohkam IHTAMAT ;
rahpančiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:rahpan#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
čuoldinmeasttirvuodjimat+CmpN/Sg:čuoldin#measttir#vuodjim IHTAMAT ;
čuoldinmeašttirvuodjimat+CmpN/Sg:čuoldin#meašttir#vuodjim IHTAMAT ;
čuoldinmeaštárvuodjimat+CmpN/Sg:čuoldin#meaštár#vuodjim IHTAMAT ;
čuoldinvuodjimat+CmpN/Sg:čuoldin#vuodjim IHTAMAT ;
sistečiekčamat+CmpN/Sg:siste#čiekčam IHTAMAT ;
